New York, session 2025-2026, A11098.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The general municipal law is amended by adding a new 2 section 77-l to read as follows: 3 § 77-l. Sports field fence leases in the town of Southeast, Putnam 4 county. Notwithstanding any provision of any general, special or local 5 law or of any charter to the contrary, the town of Southeast, Putnam 6 county, may lease any and all sports field fences at the John E. Markel 7 Memorial Park, annually, at a nominal rent, to a not-for-profit corpo- 8 ration or organization, organized under the laws of the state of New 9 York for the purpose of permitting the sale of advertising, with the 10 revenues to be used solely for the care of such John E. Markel Memorial 11 Park in the town of Southeast, Putnam county. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15516-01-6